Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-102
Public land; confirmed to the state; where recorded.

Whenever any communication shall be received by the Governor, or by any of the departments of the state government, from the Secretary of the Interior, when or whereby any lands or selection thereof shall be confirmed or certified to this state under or by virtue of any grant or Act of Congress, it shall be the duty of the Governor to cause a copy to be prepared, certified under the State Seal, and recorded in each of the counties of this state in which any of the lands in such communication are situated.

Laws 1872, § 2, p. 7;

R.S.1913, § 5839;

C.S.1922, § 5175;

C.S.1929, § 72-102;

R.S.1943, § 72-102.